California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(4) A county shall submit a request to shift funding allocation to the State Department of Health Care Services for approval after fulfilling the integrated planning and local stakeholder consultation requirements pursuant to Sections 5963.02 and 5963.03. The county shall submit the request for approval in a form and manner, and in accordance with timelines, prescribed by the department. Counties shall provide any other information, records, and reports that the department deems necessary for the purposes of this subdivision. The State Department of Health Care Services shall collaborate with the California State Association of Counties and the County Behavioral Health Directors Association of California on reasonable criteria for those requests and a timely and
 efficient approval process. Requests for approval of a shift under this
 paragraph shall be responded to, approved, or denied within 30 days of receipt by the department, or shall otherwise be deemed approved by the department.

(A) The department shall review and approve a county’s request based on the county’s compliance with paragraphs (1) and (2) and demonstration that the requested shift is responsive to local priorities, based on, at a minimum, local data and community input in the planning process.

(B) The State Department of Health Care Services may approve a proposed shift in funding allocations for the current integrated planning period based upon data and information a county submits demonstrating the need for the adjustment.

(C) Unless an annual change is approved by the State Department of Health Care Services, approved allocation adjustments are irrevocable during the applicable three-year period and a county shall not adjust the allocation of funds in the county’s subsequent annual and intermittent updates to the county’s integrated plan.

(d) The programs established pursuant to subdivision (a) shall prioritize
 services for the following populations:

(1) Eligible adults and older adults, as defined in subdivision (k), who satisfy one of the following:

(A) Are chronically homeless or experiencing homelessness or are at risk of homelessness.

(B) Are in, or are at risk of being in, the justice system.

(C) Are reentering the community from prison or jail.

(D) Are at risk of conservatorship pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 5350) of Part 1 of Division 5.

(E) Are at risk of institutionalization.

(2) Eligible children and youth, as defined in subdivision (k), who
 satisfy one of the following:

(A) Are chronically homeless or experiencing homelessness or are at risk of homelessness.

(B) Are in, or at risk of being in, the juvenile justice system.

(C) Are reentering the community from a youth correctional facility.

(D) Are in the child welfare system pursuant to Section 300, 601, or 602.

(E) Are at risk of institutionalization.

(e) (1) (A) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) of Section 5891, the allocations pursuant to subdivision (a) shall include funding for annual planning costs pursuant to Sections 5963.02 and 5963.03.

(B) The total of these costs shall not exceed 5 percent of the total of annual revenues received for the Local Behavioral Health Services Fund.

(C) The planning costs shall include funds for county mental health and substance use disorder programs to pay for the costs of consumers, family members, and other stakeholders to participate in the planning process.

(2) (A) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) of Section 5891, the allocations pursuant to subdivision (a) may include funding to improve plan operations, quality outcomes, fiscal and programmatic data reporting pursuant to Section 5963.04, and monitoring of subcontractor compliance for all county behavioral health programs, including, but not limited to, programs administered by a Medi-Cal behavioral health delivery system, as defined in
 subdivision (i) of Section 14184.101, and programs funded by the Projects for Assistance in Transition from Homelessness grant, the Community Mental Health Services Block Grant, and other Substance Abuse and Mental Health Services Administration grants.

(B) The total of the costs in subparagraph (A) shall not exceed 2 percent of the total of annual revenues received for the Local Behavioral Health Services Fund. For counties with a population of less than 200,000, the total of the costs in subparagraph (A) shall not exceed 4 percent of the total annual revenues received from the Local Behavioral Health Services Fund.

(C) A county may commence use of funding pursuant to this paragraph on July 1, 2025.

(D) Notwithstanding any other law, new costs to implement this article that exceed existing county obligations and are
 in excess of the funds provided by subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (e) shall be evaluated by the State Department of Health Care Services for inclusion in the Governor’s 2024–25 May Revision. The department shall consult with the California State Association of Counties and the County Behavioral Health Directors Association of California, no later than March 15, 2024, to evaluate the resources needed to implement this article.

(f) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) of Section 5891, prior to making the allocations pursuant to subdivisions (a), (b), (d), and (e), funds shall be reserved for:

(A) State directed purposes consistent with the Behavioral Health Services Act, for the California Health and Human Services Agency, State Department of Health Care Services, the California Behavioral Health Planning Council, the Department of Health Care
 Access and Information, the Behavioral Health Services Oversight and Accountability Commission, the State Department of Public Health, and any other state agency.

(B) The costs to assist consumers and family members so that the appropriate state and county agencies give full consideration to concerns about quality, structure of service delivery, or access to services.

(C) The costs for research and evaluation regarding the effectiveness of programs and services listed in subdivision (a) and achievement of the outcome measures and metrics pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 5897.

(D) (i) The costs of the Department of Health Care Access and Information to implement a behavioral health workforce initiative. The cost for this initiative shall be a minimum of 3 percent of the total funds
 allocated pursuant to this subdivision.

(ii) This initiative shall be developed in consultation with stakeholders, including, but not limited to, behavioral health professionals, counties, behavioral health education and training programs, and behavioral health consumer advocates. The initiative shall focus on efforts to build and support the workforce to meet the need to provide holistic and quality services and support the development and implementation of strategies for training, supporting, and retaining the county behavioral health workforce and noncounty contracted behavioral health workforce, including efforts to increase the racial, ethnic, and linguistic diversity of behavioral health providers and increase access to behavioral health providers in geographically underserved areas.

(iii) A portion of the workforce initiative may focus on providing technical assistance and
 support to county contracted providers to implement and maintain workforce provisions that support the stabilization and retention of the broad behavioral health workforce.

(iv) A portion of the workforce initiative may focus on providing technical assistance and support to county and contracted providers to maximize the use of peer support specialists.

(E) The costs for the State Department of Public Health to provide population-based mental health and substance use disorder prevention programs. A minimum of 4 percent of the total funds allocated pursuant to this subdivision shall be distributed to the State Department of Public Health for this purpose. Of these funds, at least 51 percent shall be used for programs serving populations who are 25 years of age or younger. The State Department of Public Health shall consult with the State Department of Health Care Services and the
 Behavioral Health Services Oversight and Accountability Commission to ensure the provision of these programs.

(i) Population-based prevention programs are activities designed to reduce the prevalence of mental health and substance use disorders and resulting conditions.

(ii) Population-based prevention programs shall incorporate evidence-based promising or community-defined evidence practices and meet one or more of the following conditions:

(I) Target the entire population of the state, county, or particular community to reduce the risk of individuals developing a mental health or substance use disorder.

(II) Target specific populations at elevated risk for a mental health, substance misuse, or substance use disorder.

(III) Reduce stigma associated with seeking help for mental health challenges and substance use disorders.

(IV) Target populations disproportionately impacted by systemic racism and discrimination.

(V) Prevent suicide, self-harm, or overdose.

(iii) Population-based prevention programs may be implemented statewide or in community settings.

(iv) Population-based prevention programs shall not include the provision of early intervention, diagnostic, and treatment for individuals.

(v) Population-based prevention programs shall be provided on a schoolwide or classroom basis and may be provided by a community-based organization off
 campus or on school grounds.

(vi) School-based prevention supports and programs shall be provided at a school site or arranged for by a school on a schoolwide or classroom basis and shall not provide services and supports for individuals. These supports and programs may include, but are not limited to:

(I) School-based health centers, student wellness centers, or student wellbeing centers.

(II) Activities, including, but not limited to, group coaching and consultation, designed to prevent substance misuse, increase mindfulness, self-regulation, development of protective factors, calming strategies, and communication skills.

(III) Integrated or embedded school-based programs designed to reduce stigma associated with seeking help for mental health
 challenges and substance use disorders.

(IV) Student mental health first aid programs designed to identify and prevent suicide or overdose.

(V) Integrated training and systems of support for teachers and school administrators designed to mitigate suspension and expulsion practices and assist with classroom management.

(vii) Early childhood population-based prevention programs for children 0 to 5 years of age, inclusive, shall be provided in a range of settings.

(viii) Funding under this provision shall comply with Section 5891 and shall be used to strengthen population-based strategies and not supplant funding for services and supports for which ongoing funding is available through Children and Youth Behavioral Health Initiative or other sources.

(F) The Behavioral Health Services Act Innovation Partnership Fund as provided for in Section 5845.1. A maximum of twenty million dollars ($20,000,000) shall be deposited into the fund annually, for fiscal years 2026–27 to 2030–31, inclusive. Thereafter funding shall be determined through the annual budget act.

(G) At its discretion, the commission may utilize funding received in support of the Mental Health Wellness Act to support this section, consistent with subparagraph (F) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (g), and subdivision (h), of Section 5848.5.

(2) The costs for the purposes specified in paragraph (1) shall not exceed 10 percent of the total of annual revenues received for the State Behavioral Health Services Fund. The amount of funds available for the purposes of this subdivision in any fiscal year is subject
 to appropriation in the annual Budget Act.

(g) Each county shall place all funds received from the State Behavioral Health Services Fund in a local Behavioral Health Services Fund. The Local Behavioral Health Services Fund balance shall be invested consistent with other county funds and the interest earned on the investments shall be transferred into the fund. The earnings on investment of these funds shall be available for distribution from the fund in future fiscal years.

(h) All expenditures for county behavioral health programs shall be consistent with a currently approved county integrated plan or annual update pursuant to Section 5963.02 or an intermittent update prepared pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 5963.03.

(i) (1) Other than funds placed in a reserve in accordance with an
 approved plan, any funds allocated to a county that have not been spent for their authorized purpose within three years, and the interest accruing on those funds, shall revert to the state to be deposited into the Reversion Account, hereby established in the fund, and available for other counties in future years, provided, however, that funds, including interest accrued on those funds, for capital facilities, technological needs, or education and training may be retained for up to 10 years before reverting to the Reversion Account.

(2) (A) The Controller shall revert funds by offsetting amounts from each monthly distribution to a county’s Local Behavioral Health Service Fund pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 5891, until the full amount of the reverted funds has been offset. The reverted funds shall be deposited into the Reversion Account for use, consistent with this section and Sections 5890, 5891 and 5891.5, as
 determined by the State Department of Health Care Services.

(B) Funds that have been reverted that are owed to a county as a result of an audit adjustment, or for other reasons, shall be paid from the Reversion Account. If the balance of funds in the Reversion Account is inadequate, funds owed to a county shall be offset from the monthly distributions to other counties pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 5891, based on a methodology provided by the State Department of Health Care Services. Owed funds shall be paid to a county in the monthly distribution pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 5891.

(C) If the State Department of Health Care Services withholds funds from a monthly distribution to a county pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 5963.04, funds shall be reverted first and the remaining balance shall be withheld.

(3) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), funds allocated to a county with a population of less than 200,000 that have not been spent for their authorized purpose within five years shall revert to the state as described in paragraph (1).

(j) If there are revenues available in the fund after the State Department of Health Care Services has determined there are prudent reserves and no unmet needs for any of the programs funded pursuant to this section, the department, in consultation with counties, shall develop a plan for expenditures of these revenues to further the purposes of this act and the Legislature may appropriate these funds for any purpose consistent with the department’s plan that furthers the purposes of this act.

(k) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Behavioral health services” means mental health services and substance use disorder treatment services, as defined in Section 5891.5.

(2) “Chronically homeless” means an individual or family that is chronically homeless, as defined in Section 11360 of Title 42 of the United States Code, or as otherwise modified or expanded by the State Department of Health Care Services.

(3) “Experiencing homelessness or are at risk of homelessness” means people who are homeless or at risk of homelessness, as defined in Section 91.5 of Title 24 of the Code of Federal Regulations, or as otherwise defined by the State Department of Health Care Services for purposes of the Medi-Cal program.

(4) “Outreach and engagement” means activities to reach, identify, and engage individuals and communities in the behavioral health
 system, including peers and families, and to reduce disparities. Counties may include evidence-based practices and community-defined evidence practices in the provision of activities.

(5) “Workforce education and training” includes, but is not limited to, the following for the county workforce:

(A) Workforce recruitment, development, training, and retention.

(B) Professional licensing and/or certification testing and fees.

(C) Loan repayment.

(D) Retention incentives and stipends.

(E) Internship and apprenticeship programs.

(F) Continuing education.

(G) Efforts to increase the racial, ethnic, and geographic diversity of the behavioral health workforce.

(6) “Community-defined evidence practices” means an alternative or complement to evidence-based practices, that offer culturally anchored interventions that reflect the values, practices, histories, and lived-experiences of the communities they serve. These practices come from the community and the organizations that serve them and are found to yield positive results as determined by community consensus over time.

(7) (A) “Eligible children and youth” means persons who are 25 years of age or under, including early childhood or transition age youth who do either of the following:

(i) Meet the criteria specified in subdivision (d) of
 Section 14184.402, notwithstanding age limitations.

(ii) Have a substance use disorder, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 5891.5.

(B) Eligible children and youth are not required to be enrolled in the Medi-Cal program.

(8) (A) “Eligible adults and older adults” means persons who are 26 years of age or older who do either of the following:

(i) Meet the criteria specified in subdivision (c) of Section 14184.402.

(ii) Have a substance use disorder, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 5891.5.

(B) Eligible adults and older adults are not required to be enrolled in the Medi-Cal program.

(l) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2026, if amendments to the Mental Health Services Act are approved by the voters at the March 5, 2024, statewide primary election.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 790, Sec. 95) by Stats. 2026, Ch. 27, Sec. 64.   (SB 164)   Effective June 29, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

5892.1.

(a) All unspent funds subject to reversion pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 5892 as of July 1, 2017, are deemed to have been reverted to the fund and reallocated to the county of origin for the purposes for which they were originally allocated.

(b) (1) The department shall, on or before July 1, 2018, in consultation with counties and other stakeholders, prepare a report to the Legislature identifying the amounts that were subject to reversion prior to July 1, 2017, including to which purposes the unspent funds were allocated pursuant to Section 5892.

(2) Prior to the preparation of the report referenced in paragraph (1), the department shall provide to counties the amounts
 it has determined are subject to reversion, and provide a process for counties to appeal this determination.

(c) (1) By July 1, 2018, each county with unspent funds subject to reversion that are deemed reverted and reallocated pursuant to subdivision (a) shall prepare a plan to expend these funds on or before July 1, 2020. The plan shall be submitted to the commission for review.

(2) A county with unspent funds that are deemed reverted and reallocated pursuant to subdivision (a) that has not prepared and submitted a plan to the commission pursuant to paragraph (1) as of January 1, 2019, shall remit the unspent funds to the state pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (h) of Section 5892 no later than July 1, 2019.

(d) Funds included in the plan required pursuant to subdivision (c) that are not
 spent as of July 1, 2020, shall revert to the state pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (h) of Section 5892.

(e) Notwithstanding subdivision (d), innovation funds included in the plan required pursuant to subdivision (c) that are not spent by July 1, 2020, or the end of the project plan approved by the Behavioral Health Services Oversight and Accountability Commission pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 5830, whichever is later, shall revert to the state pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 5892.

(f) (1) The requirement for submitting a report imposed under subdivision (b) is inoperative on July 1, 2022, pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code.

(2) A report to be submitted pursuant to subdivision (b) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the
 Government Code.

(g) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department, without taking any further regulatory action, may implement, interpret, or make specific this section, Section 5899.1, and subdivision (h) of Section 5892, by means of all-county letters or other similar instructions, until applicable regulations are adopted in accordance with Section 5898, or until July 1, 2019, whichever occurs first. The all-county letters or other similar instructions shall be issued only after the department provides the opportunity for public participation and comments.

(h) If amendments to the Mental Health Services Act are approved by the voters at the March 5, 2024, statewide primary election, this section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2026, and as of January 1, 2027, is
 repealed.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 790, Sec. 96) by Stats. 2025, Ch. 243, Sec. 19.   (SB 862)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Inoperative July 1, 2026, by its own provisions.    Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.    See later operative version added by Sec. 97 of Stats. 2023, Ch. 790.)
-------------------------------------------

5892.1.

(a) All unspent funds subject to reversion pursuant to subdivision (i) of Section 5892 as of July 1, 2017, are deemed to have been reverted to the fund and reallocated to the county of origin for the purposes for which they were originally allocated.

(b) (1) The department shall, on or before July 1, 2018, in consultation with counties and other stakeholders, prepare a report to the Legislature identifying the amounts that were subject to reversion prior to July 1, 2017, including to which purposes the unspent funds were allocated pursuant to Section 5892.

(2) Prior to the preparation of the
 report referenced in paragraph (1), the department shall provide to counties the amounts it has determined are subject to reversion and provide a process for counties to appeal this determination.

(c) (1) By July 1, 2018, each county with unspent funds subject to reversion that are deemed reverted and reallocated pursuant to subdivision (a) shall prepare a plan to expend these funds on or before July 1, 2020. The plan shall be submitted to the commission for review.

(2) A county with unspent funds that are deemed reverted and reallocated pursuant to subdivision (a) that has not prepared and submitted a plan to the commission pursuant to paragraph (1) as of January 1, 2019, shall remit the unspent funds to the state pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision
 (i) of Section 5892 no later than July 1, 2019.

(d) Funds included in the plan required pursuant to subdivision (c) that are not spent as of July 1, 2020, shall revert to the state pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (i) of Section 5892.

(e) Notwithstanding subdivision (d), innovation funds included in the plan required pursuant to subdivision (c) that are not spent by July 1, 2020, or the end of the project plan approved by the Behavioral Health Service Oversight and Accountability Commission pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 5830, whichever is later, shall revert to the state pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 5892.

(f) (1) The requirement for submitting a report imposed under subdivision
 (b) is inoperative on July 1, 2022, pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code.

(2) A report to be submitted pursuant to subdivision (b) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(g) (1) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department, without taking further regulatory action, may implement, interpret, or make specific this section, Section 5899.1, and subdivision (h) of Section 5892 by means of all-county letters or other similar instructions until applicable regulations are adopted in accordance with Section 5898 or until July 1, 2019, whichever occurs first.

(2) The
 all-county letters or other similar instructions shall be issued only after the department provides the opportunity for public participation and comments.

(h) This section shall be operative on July 1, 2026, if amendments to the Mental Health Services Act are approved by the voters at the March 5, 2024, statewide primary election.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 96) and added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 790, Sec. 97.   (SB 326)   Effective October 12, 2023.   Operative July 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

5892.2.

(a) The State Department of Health Care Services, in consultation with the County Behavioral Health Directors Association of California, shall establish a methodology for determining annual minimum expenditure levels for funds distributed pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 5891. Beginning in the 2028–29 fiscal year, the minimum expenditure level shall be calculated using the average annual amount of distributed funds for a county in the preceding three years, without weighting or adjustment.

(1) Beginning in the 2028–29 fiscal year, by November 1 of each year the State Department of Health Care Services shall calculate minimum expenditure levels for each county for the following three fiscal years.

(2) (A) Each year, the State Department of Health Care Services shall calculate a revised minimum expenditure level for the next fiscal year to be used for the annual update upon receipt of an updated Behavioral Health Services Fund local assistance revenue projection from the State Department of Finance.

(B) The State Department of Health Care Services shall publish the revised minimum expenditure level if it is lower than the minimum expenditure level by 10 percent or more.

(b) (1) Commencing with the 2029–30 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, a county shall spend an amount of distributed funds that is equal to or greater than the minimum expenditure level for that fiscal year, calculated in the prior year, pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a).

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), if the State Department of Health Care Services publishes a minimum expenditure level for a fiscal year pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) a county shall spend an amount of distributed funds that is equal to or greater than the revised minimum expenditure level.

(c) A county may only spend funds from its prudent reserve when any of the following conditions occur:

(1) During any fiscal year for which the department publishes a revised minimum expenditure level pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a).

(2) During any fiscal year in which the amount of distributed funds is less than the minimum expenditure level calculated pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) for
 that fiscal year.

(3) During any fiscal year in which the county determines that there has been a change in local behavioral health needs or circumstances, such that transfers from the prudent reserve are necessary to maintain behavioral health services, respond to local, state, or federally declared emergency, or mitigate unanticipated fiscal constraints.

(d) (1) A county shall update the budget in the county’s integrated plan or annual update pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 5963.02 for any fiscal year the minimum expenditure level calculated pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) is higher or lower than the prior year’s minimum expenditure level for the same fiscal year by 10 percent or more.

(2) A county shall update the budget in the county’s integrated plan or
 annual update pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 5963.02 for any fiscal year for which the department publishes a revised minimum expenditure level pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a).

(e) For purposes of this section “distributed funds” means funds the State Controller distributes to a county pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 5891.

(f) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this section by means of plan or county letters, information notices, plan or provider bulletins, or other similar instructions without taking further regulatory action. Instructions issued by the department shall be consistent with this section.

(g) This
 section shall become operative July 1, 2028.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 27, Sec. 65.   (SB 164)   Effective June 29, 2026.   Operative July 1, 2028, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

5892.3.

(a) There is hereby created a Behavioral Health Services Act Revenue Stability Workgroup to assess year-over-year fluctuations in tax revenues generated by the Behavioral Health Services Act, in recognition of the need for a reliable strategy for short- and long-term fiscal stability, commencing no later than June 30, 2024.

(b) The workgroup shall develop and recommend solutions to reduce Behavioral Health Services Act revenue volatility and to propose appropriate prudent reserve levels to support the sustainability of county programs and services.

(c) (1) The California Health and
 Human Services Agency and the State Department of Health Care Services shall jointly convene and lead the workgroup.

(2) Members of the workgroup shall serve without compensation. Members shall include representatives from the following entities:

(A) Behavioral Health Services Oversight and Accountability Commission.

(B) Legislative Analyst’s Office.

(C) County Behavioral Health Director’s Association of California.

(D) California State Association of Counties, including both urban and rural county representatives.

(3) The
 California Department of Finance may consult with the workgroup, as needed, to provide technical assistance.

(d) The workgroup shall review and analyze current and historical revenues generated pursuant to the Mental Health Services Act and the Behavioral Health Services Act and current and historical prudent reserve levels to develop the recommendations specified in subdivision (b).

(e) On or before June 30, 2025, the California Health and Human Services Agency and the State Department of Health Care Services shall submit a report that includes its recommendations specified in subdivision (b) to the Legislature and the Governor’s Office.

(f) The workgroup may meet as often as necessary, as determined by the members of the workgroup, until the workgroup is disbanded upon submission of the report specified in subdivision (b).

(g) Prudent reserve requirements specified in this subdivision may be changed, and requirements to mitigate Behavioral Health Services Act revenue volatility and improve fiscal stability may be developed, based upon recommendations made by the Behavioral Health Services Act Revenue Stability Workgroup pursuant to Section 5892.3. 

(h) The California Health and Human Services Agency and the State Department of Health Care Services may jointly reconvene the workgroup, if at any point the recommended revenue volatility strategy and prudent reserve requirements no longer adequately support the sustainability of county programs and services given the year-over-year fluctuations in tax revenues generated by the Behavioral Health Services Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 790, Sec. 98.   (SB 326)   Effective April 17, 2024.   Approved in Proposition 1 at the March 5, 2024, election.     Operative January 1, 2025, pursuant to Sec. 117 of Proposition 1.)
-------------------------------------------

5892.5.

(a) (1) The California Housing Finance Agency, with the concurrence of the State Department of Health Care Services, shall release unencumbered Behavioral Health Services Fund moneys dedicated to the Mental Health Services Act housing program upon the written request of the respective county. The county shall use these Behavioral Health Services Fund moneys released by the agency to provide housing assistance to the target populations who are identified in Section 5600.3.

(2) For purposes of this section, “housing assistance” means each of the following:

(A) Rental assistance or capitalized operating subsidies.

(B) Security deposits, utility deposits, or other move-in cost assistance.

(C) Utility payments.

(D) Moving cost assistance.

(E) Capital funding to build or rehabilitate housing for homeless, mentally ill persons or mentally ill persons who are at risk of being homeless.

(b) For purposes of administering those funds released to a respective county pursuant to subdivision (a), the county shall comply with all of the requirements described in the Mental Health Services Act, including, but not limited to, Sections 5664, 5847, subdivision (h) of Section 5892, and 5899.

(c) If amendments to the Mental Health Services Act are approved by the voters at the March 5, 2024, statewide
 primary election, this section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2026, and as of January 1, 2027, is repealed.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 790, Sec. 99) by Stats. 2024, Ch. 40, Sec. 49.   (SB 159)   Effective June 29, 2024.   Inoperative July 1, 2026, by its own provisions.    Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.    See later operative version added by Sec. 100 of Stats. 2023, Ch. 790.)
-------------------------------------------

5892.5.

(a) (1) The California Housing Finance Agency, with the concurrence of the State Department of Health Care Services, shall release unencumbered Behavioral Health Services Fund moneys dedicated to the Mental Health Services Act housing program upon the written request of the respective county.

(2) The county shall use these Behavioral Health Services Fund moneys released by the agency to provide housing interventions pursuant to Section 5830.

(b) For purposes of administering those funds released to a respective county pursuant to subdivision (a), the county shall comply with all of
 the requirements described in the Behavioral Health Services Act, including, but not limited to, Section 5664, Section 5963.02, subdivision (g) of Section 5892, and Section 5963.04.

(c) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2026, if amendments to the Mental Health Services Act are approved by the voters at the March 5, 2024, statewide primary election.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 99) and added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 790, Sec. 100.   (SB 326)   Effective April 17, 2024.   Approved in Proposition 1 at the March 5, 2024, election.     Operative July 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

5893.

(a) In any year in which the funds available exceed the amount allocated to counties, such funds shall be carried forward to the next fiscal year to be available for distribution to counties in accordance with Section 5892 in that fiscal year.

(b) All funds deposited into the Behavioral Health Services Fund shall be invested in the same manner in which other state funds are invested. The fund shall be increased by its share of the amount earned on investments.

(c) If amendments to the Mental Health Services Act are approved by the voters at the March 5, 2024, statewide primary election, this section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2026, and as of January 1, 2027, is
 repealed.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 790, Sec. 101) by Stats. 2024, Ch. 40, Sec. 50.   (SB 159)   Effective June 29, 2024.   Operative January 1, 2025, pursuant to Sec. 85 of Stats. 2024, Ch. 40.   Inoperative July 1, 2026, by its own provisions.    Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.    See later operative version added by Sec. 102 of Stats. 2023, Ch. 790.)
-------------------------------------------

5893.

(a) In a year that the funds available exceed the amount allocated to counties, the excess funds shall be carried forward to the next fiscal year to be available for distribution to counties in accordance with Section 5892 in that fiscal year.

(b) (1) All funds deposited into the Behavioral Health Services Fund shall be invested in the same manner that other state funds are invested.

(2) The fund shall be increased by its share of the amount earned on investments.

(c) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2026, if amendments
 to the Mental Health Services Act are approved by voters at the March 5, 2024, statewide primary election.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 101) and added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 790, Sec. 102.   (SB 326)   Effective October 12, 2023.   Operative July 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

5894.

In the event that Part 3 (commencing with Section 5800) or Part 4 (commencing with Section 5850) of this division, are restructured by legislation signed into law before the adoption of this measure, the funding provided by this measure shall be distributed in accordance with such legislation; provided, however, that nothing herein shall be construed to reduce the categories of persons entitled to receive services.

(History: Added November 2, 2004, by initiative Proposition 63, Sec. 15.   Operative January 1, 2005, pursuant to Sec. 16 of Prop. 63.)
-------------------------------------------

5895.

(a) If any provisions of Part 3 (commencing with Section 5800) or Part 4 (commencing with Section 5850) are repealed or modified so the purposes of this act cannot be accomplished, the funds in the Behavioral Health Services Fund shall be administered in accordance with those sections as they read on January 1, 2004.

(b) If amendments to the Mental Health Services Act are approved by the voters at the March 5, 2024, statewide primary election, this section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2026, and as of January 1, 2027, is repealed.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 790, Sec. 103) by Stats. 2024, Ch. 40, Sec. 51.   (SB 159)   Effective June 29, 2024.   Operative January 1, 2025, pursuant to Sec. 85 of Stats. 2024, Ch. 40.   Inoperative July 1, 2026, by its own provisions.    Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

5897.

(a) Notwithstanding any other state law, the State Department of Health Care Services shall implement the mental health services provided by Part 3 (commencing with Section 5800), Part 3.6 (commencing with Section 5840), and Part 4 (commencing with Section 5850) through contracts with county mental health programs or counties acting jointly. A contract may be exclusive and may be awarded on a geographic basis. For purposes of this section, a county mental health program includes a city receiving funds pursuant to Section 5701.5.

(b) Two or more counties acting jointly may agree to deliver or subcontract for the delivery of those mental health services. The agreement may encompass all or any part of the mental health services provided pursuant to these parts. Any
 agreement between counties shall delineate each county’s responsibilities and fiscal liability.
